North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-38 Electrologists and Electronic Hair Removal Technicians

43-38-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Electrologist” means a qualified and licensed person proficient in the removal of hair by means of the electric needle.

“Electrolysis” means the removal of superfluous hair by use of the electric needle or electronic process.

“Electronic hair removal technician” means a qualified and licensed person proficient in the removal of hair by means of an electronic process other than the electric needle.

“State health council” means the state health council as defined in chapter 23-01.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 476, § 1.

43-38-02.
Electrologist and electronic hair removal technician licensure — Duties of state health council.

The state health council shall issue an electrologist’s or electronic hair removal technician’s license. The annual license must be determined annually by the council but may not exceed fifty dollars for new licenses and not exceed twenty-five dollars for relicensure.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 476, § 2.

43-38-03.
Rulemaking authority of state health council. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health council shall establish standards, rules, and regulations which are found necessary for the maintenance of public health, including sanitation and disease control. The council has the following powers:

To establish minimum age levels.

To establish education and training levels for electrologists and electronic hair removal technicians.

To issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses.

To develop application and licensure forms.

To delegate the administration of the program to the state health officer, subject to such provisions as the council may make for appeal to it.

To promulgate such requirements as may be found necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter.

All electrologists and electronic hair removal technicians practicing in North Dakota prior to July 1, 1979, may, without examination, be issued a license by the council upon proof, satisfactory to the council, of having met the qualifications.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 476, § 3.

43-38-03.
Rulemaking authority of department of health and human services. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish standards, rules, and regulations that are found necessary for the maintenance of public health, including sanitation and disease control. The department of health and human services has the following powers:

To establish minimum age levels.

To establish education and training levels for electrologists and electronic hair removal technicians.

To issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses.

To develop application and licensure forms.

To delegate the administration of the program to the state health officer, subject to such provisions as the council may make for appeal to it.

To promulgate such requirements as may be found necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter.

All electrologists and electronic hair removal technicians practicing in North Dakota prior to July 1, 1979, may, without examination, be issued a license by the department of health and human services upon proof, satisfactory to the department, of having met the qualifications.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 476, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 366, effective September 1, 2022.

43-38-04.
Penalty.

Any person who holds out as an electrologist or an electronic hair removal technician without having met the requirements and without an annual license or violates any of the provisions of this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated hereunder is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 476, § 4.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.